Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1123
Subject; response to petition.

The subject may admit or deny the allegations of the petition or choose to not answer. If the subject denies the allegations of the petition, the court shall proceed to conduct a hearing on the petition. If the subject is unable to understand the nature and possible consequences of the proceedings or chooses to not answer, the court shall enter a denial of the allegations of the petition on the subject's behalf and shall proceed to conduct a hearing on the petition. If the subject admits to the allegations of the petition, the court shall determine whether the admission is free and voluntary and, if the court finds a factual basis to support the admission, may find the subject to be a person in need of court-ordered custody and treatment.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 23.